client/braille/liblouis/tables/ja-rokutenkanji.utb
# begin character class rules
attribute katakana アイウエオカガキギクグケゲコゴサザシジスズセゼソゾタダチヂッツヅテデトドナニヌネノハバパヒビピフブプヘベペホボポマミムメモヤユヨラリルレロヮワヰヱヲンヴーヵヶァィゥェォャュョ
attribute hankakukatakana ｱｲｳｴｵｶｶﾞｷｷﾞｸｸﾞｹｹﾞｺｺﾞｻｻﾞｼｼﾞｽｽﾞｾｾﾞｿｿﾞﾀﾀﾞﾁﾁﾞｯﾂﾂﾞﾃﾃﾞﾄﾄﾞﾅﾆﾇﾈﾉﾊﾊﾞﾊﾟﾋﾋﾞﾋﾟﾌﾌﾞﾌﾟﾍﾍﾞﾍﾟﾎﾎﾞﾎﾟﾏﾐﾑﾒﾓﾔﾕﾖﾗﾘﾙﾚﾛヮﾜヰヱｦﾝｳﾞｰヵヶｧｨｩｪｫｬｭｮ
attribute hiragana あいうえおかきくけこさしすせそたちつてとなにぬねのはひふへほまみむめもやゆよらいるれろわをんがぎぐげござじずぜぞだぢづでどばびぶべぼぱぴぷぺぽっ
# begin Zenkaku Katakana rules
# Katakana characters are indicated with Katakana opening dots6-36 and closing dots23.
# Some Katakana combinations cannot be properly indicated.
# For example, after small Katakana "ァィゥェオャュョ"
# because they are defined with "always".
noback context `["ー"]%space @6-36-25-23
noback context `["ー"]%hiragana @6-36-25-23
noback context `["ア"]%space @6-36-1-23
noback context `["イ"]%space @6-36-12-23
noback context `["ウ"]%space @6-36-14-23
noback context `["エ"]%space @6-36-124-23
noback context `["オ"]%space @6-36-24-23
noback context `["カ"]%space @6-36-16-23
noback context `["キ"]%space @6-36-126-23
noback context `["ク"]%space @6-36-146-23
noback context `["ケ"]%space @6-36-12468-23
noback context `["コ"]%space @6-36-246-23
noback context `["ガ"]%space @6-36-5-16-23
noback context `["ギ"]%space @6-36-5-126-23
noback context `["グ"]%space @6-36-5-146-23
noback context `["ゲ"]%space @6-36-5-1246-23
noback context `["ゴ"]%space @6-36-5-246-23
noback context `["サ"]%space @6-36-156-23
noback context `["シ"]%space @6-36-1256-23
noback context `["ス"]%space @6-36-1456-23
noback context `["セ"]%space @6-36-12456-23
noback context `["ソ"]%space @6-36-2456-23
noback context `["ザ"]%space @6-36-5-156-23
noback context `["ジ"]%space @6-36-5-1256-23
noback context `["ズ"]%space @6-36-5-1456-23
noback context `["ゼ"]%space @6-36-5-12456-23
noback context `["ゾ"]%space @6-36-5-2456-23
noback context `["タ"]%space @6-36-135-23
noback context `["チ"]%space @6-36-1235-23
noback context `["ツ"]%space @6-36-1345-23
noback context `["テ"]%space @6-36-12345-23
noback context `["ト"]%space @6-36-2345-23
noback context `["ダ"]%space @6-36-5-135-23
noback context `["ヂ"]%space @6-36-5-1235-23
noback context `["ヅ"]%space @6-36-5-1345-23
noback context `["デ"]%space @6-36-5-12345-23
noback context `["ド"]%space @6-36-5-2345-23
noback context `["ナ"]%space @6-36-13-23
noback context `["ニ"]%space @6-36-123-23
noback context `["ヌ"]%space @6-36-134-23
noback context `["ネ"]%space @6-36-1234-23
noback context `["ノ"]%space @6-36-234-23
noback context `["ハ"]%space @6-36-136-23
noback context `["ヒ"]%space @6-36-1236-23
noback context `["フ"]%space @6-36-1346-23
noback context `["ヘ"]%space @6-36-12346-23
noback context `["ホ"]%space @6-36-2346-23
noback context `["バ"]%space @6-36-5-136-23
noback context `["ビ"]%space @6-36-5-1236-23
noback context `["ブ"]%space @6-36-5-1346-23
noback context `["ベ"]%space @6-36-5-12346-23
noback context `["ボ"]%space @6-36-5-2346-23
noback context `["パ"]%space @6-36-6-136-23
noback context `["ピ"]%space @6-36-6-1236-23
noback context `["プ"]%space @6-36-6-1346-23
noback context `["ペ"]%space @6-36-6-12346-23
noback context `["ポ"]%space @6-36-6-2346-23
noback context `["マ"]%space @6-36-1356-23
noback context `["ミ"]%space @6-36-12356-23
noback context `["ム"]%space @6-36-13456-23
noback context `["メ"]%space @6-36-123456-23
noback context `["モ"]%space @6-36-23456-23
noback context `["ヤ"]%space @6-36-34-23
noback context `["ユ"]%space @6-36-346-23
noback context `["ヨ"]%space @6-36-345-23
noback context `["ラ"]%space @6-36-15-23
noback context `["リ"]%space @6-36-125-23
noback context `["ル"]%space @6-36-145-23
noback context `["レ"]%space @6-36-1245-23
noback context `["ロ"]%space @6-36-245-23
noback context `["ワ"]%space @6-36-3-23
noback context `["ヲ"]%space @6-36-35-23
noback context `["ン"]%space @6-36-356-23
noback context `["ア"]%hiragana @6-36-1-23
noback context `["イ"]%hiragana @6-36-12-23
noback context `["ウ"]%hiragana @6-36-14-23
noback context `["エ"]%hiragana @6-36-124-23
noback context `["オ"]%hiragana @6-36-24-23
noback context `["カ"]%hiragana @6-36-16-23
noback context `["キ"]%hiragana @6-36-126-23
noback context `["ク"]%hiragana @6-36-146-23
noback context `["ケ"]%hiragana @6-36-1246-23
noback context `["コ"]%hiragana @6-36-246-23
noback context `["ガ"]%hiragana @6-36-5-16-23
noback context `["ギ"]%hiragana @6-36-5-126-23
noback context `["グ"]%hiragana @6-36-5-146-23
noback context `["ゲ"]%hiragana @6-36-5-1246-23
noback context `["ゴ"]%hiragana @6-36-5-246-23
noback context `["サ"]%hiragana @6-36-156-23
noback context `["シ"]%hiragana @6-36-1256-23
noback context `["ス"]%hiragana @6-36-1456-23
noback context `["セ"]%hiragana @6-36-12456-23
noback context `["ソ"]%hiragana @6-36-2456-23
noback context `["ザ"]%hiragana @6-36-5-156-23
noback context `["ジ"]%hiragana @6-36-5-1256-23
noback context `["ズ"]%hiragana @6-36-5-1456-23
noback context `["ゼ"]%hiragana @6-36-5-12456-23
noback context `["ゾ"]%hiragana @6-36-5-2456-23
noback context `["タ"]%hiragana @6-36-153-23
noback context `["チ"]%hiragana @6-36-1235-23
noback context `["ツ"]%hiragana @6-36-1345-23
noback context `["テ"]%hiragana @6-36-12345-23
noback context `["ト"]%hiragana @6-36-2345-23
noback context `["ダ"]%hiragana @6-36-5-135-23
noback context `["ヂ"]%hiragana @6-36-5-1235-23
noback context `["ヅ"]%hiragana @6-36-5-1345-23
noback context `["デ"]%hiragana @6-36-5-12345-23
noback context `["ド"]%hiragana @6-36-5-2345-23
noback context `["ナ"]%hiragana @6-36-13-23
noback context `["ニ"]%hiragana @6-36-123-23
noback context `["ヌ"]%hiragana @6-36-134-23
noback context `["ネ"]%hiragana @6-36-1234-23
noback context `["ノ"]%hiragana @6-36-234-23
noback context `["ハ"]%hiragana @6-36-136-23
noback context `["ヒ"]%hiragana @6-36-1236-23
noback context `["フ"]%hiragana @6-36-1346-23
noback context `["ヘ"]%hiragana @6-36-12346-23
noback context `["ホ"]%hiragana @6-36-2346-23
noback context `["バ"]%hiragana @6-36-5-136-23
noback context `["ビ"]%hiragana @6-36-5-1236-23
noback context `["ブ"]%hiragana @6-36-5-1346-23
noback context `["ベ"]%hiragana @6-36-5-12346-23
noback context `["ボ"]%hiragana @6-36-5-2346-23
noback context `["パ"]%hiragana @6-36-6-136-23
noback context `["ピ"]%hiragana @6-36-6-1236-23
noback context `["プ"]%hiragana @6-36-6-1346-23
noback context `["ペ"]%hiragana @6-36-6-12346-23
noback context `["ポ"]%hiragana @6-36-6-2346-23
noback context `["マ"]%hiragana @6-36-1356-23
noback context `["ミ"]%hiragana @6-36-12356-23
noback context `["ム"]%hiragana @6-36-13456-23
noback context `["メ"]%hiragana @6-36-123456-23
noback context `["モ"]%hiragana @6-36-23456-23
noback context `["ヤ"]%hiragana @6-36-34-23
noback context `["ユ"]%hiragana @6-36-346-23
noback context `["ヨ"]%hiragana @6-36-345-23
noback context `["ラ"]%hiragana @6-36-15-23
noback context `["リ"]%hiragana @6-36-125-23
noback context `["ル"]%hiragana @6-36-145-23
noback context `["レ"]%hiragana @6-36-1245-23
noback context `["ロ"]%hiragana @6-36-245-23
noback context `["ワ"]%hiragana @6-36-3-23
noback context `["ヲ"]%hiragana @6-36-35-23
noback context `["ン"]%hiragana @6-36-356-23
noback context ["ウィ"]%hiragana @26-12-23
noback context ["ウェ"]%hiragana @26-124-23
noback context ["ウォ"]%hiragana @26-24-23
noback context ["キャ"]%hiragana @4-16-23
noback context ["キュ"]%hiragana @4-146-23
noback context ["キョ"]%hiragana @4-246-23
noback context ["ギャ"]%hiragana @45-16-23
noback context ["ギュ"]%hiragana @45-146-23
noback context ["ギョ"]%hiragana @45-246-23
noback context ["シャ"]%hiragana @4-156-23
noback context ["シュ"]%hiragana @4-1456-23
noback context ["ショ"]%hiragana @4-2456-23
noback context ["ジャ"]%hiragana @45-156-23
noback context ["ジュ"]%hiragana @45-1456-23
noback context ["ジョ"]%hiragana @45-2456-23
noback context ["シェ"]%hiragana @4-12456-23
noback context ["ジェ"]%hiragana @45-12456-23
noback context ["シャ"]~ @4-156-23
noback context ["シュ"]~ @4-1456-23
noback context ["ショ"]~ @4-2456-23
noback context ["ジャ"]~ @45-156-23
noback context ["ジュ"]~ @45-1456-23
noback context ["ジョ"]~ @45-2456-23
noback context ["シェ"]~ @4-12456-23
noback context ["ジェ"]~ @45-12456-23
noback context ["チャ"]%hiragana @4-135-23
noback context ["チュ"]%hiragana @4-1345-23
noback context ["チョ"]%hiragana @4-2345-23
noback context ["チェ"]%hiragana @4-12345-23
noback context ["ティ"]%hiragana @4-1235-23
noback context ["ディ"]%hiragana @45-1235-23
noback context ["トゥ"]%hiragana @26-1345-23
noback context ["ドゥ"]%hiragana @256-1345-23
noback context ["チャ"]~ @4-135-23
noback context ["チュ"]~ @4-1345-23
noback context ["チョ"]~ @4-2345-23
noback context ["チェ"]~ @4-12345-23
noback context ["ティ"]~ @4-1235-23
noback context ["ディ"]~ @45-1235-23
noback context ["トゥ"]~ @26-1345-23
noback context ["ドゥ"]~ @256-1345-23
noback context ["ニャ"]%hiragana @4-13-23
noback context ["ニュ"]%hiragana @4-134-23
noback context ["ニョ"]%hiragana @4-234-23
noback context ["ニャ"]~ @4-13-23
noback context ["ニュ"]~ @4-134-23
noback context ["ニョ"]~ @4-234-23
noback context ["ヒャ"]%hiragana @4-136-23
noback context ["ヒュ"]%hiragana @4-1346-23
noback context ["ヒョ"]%hiragana @4-2346-23
noback context ["ヒャ"]~ @4-136-23
noback context ["ヒュ"]~ @4-1346-23
noback context ["ヒョ"]~ @4-2346-23
noback context `["ファ"]~ @26-136-23
noback context ["ファ"]%hiragana @26-136-23
noback context `["フィ"]~ @26-1236-23
noback context ["フィ"]%hiragana @26-1236-23
noback context `["フォ"]~ @26-2346-23
noback context ["フォ"]%hiragana @26-2346-23
noback context `[]%katakana @6-36
noback context %katakana[]~ @23
noback context %katakana[]!%katakana @23
noback context !%katakana[]%katakana @6-36
# end Zenkaku Katakana rules
# begin Hankaku Katakana rules
# Hankaku Katakana characters are indicated with Katakana opening dots6-36-46 and closing dots23.
# For example, after small Katakana "ｧｨｩｪｵｬｭｮ"
noback context `["ｰ"]%space @6-36-46-25-23
noback context `["ｰ"]%hiragana @6-36-46-25-23
noback context `["ｱ"]%space @6-36-46-1-23
noback context `["ｲ"]%space @6-36-46-12-23
noback context `["ｳ"]%space @6-36-46-14-23
noback context `["ｴ"]%space @6-36-46-124-23
noback context `["ｵ"]%space @6-36-46-24-23
noback context `["ｶ"]%space @6-36-46-16-23
noback context `["ｷ"]%space @6-36-46-126-23
noback context `["ｸ"]%space @6-36-46-146-23
noback context `["ｹ"]%space @6-36-46-12468-23
noback context `["ｺ"]%space @6-36-46-246-23
noback context `["ｶﾞ"]%space @6-36-46-5-16-23
noback context `["ｷﾞ"]%space @6-36-46-5-126-23
noback context `["ｸﾞ"]%space @6-36-46-5-146-23
noback context `["ｹﾞ"]%space @6-36-46-5-1246-23
noback context `["ｺﾞ"]%space @6-36-46-5-246-23
noback context `["ｻ"]%space @6-36-46-156-23
noback context `["ｼ"]%space @6-36-46-1256-23
noback context `["ｽ"]%space @6-36-46-1456-23
noback context `["ｾ"]%space @6-36-46-12456-23
noback context `["ｿ"]%space @6-36-46-2456-23
noback context `["ｻﾞ"]%space @6-36-46-5-156-23
noback context `["ｼﾞ"]%space @6-36-46-5-1256-23
noback context `["ｽﾞ"]%space @6-36-46-5-1456-23
noback context `["ｾﾞ"]%space @6-36-46-5-12456-23
noback context `["ｿﾞ"]%space @6-36-46-5-2456-23
noback context `["ﾀ"]%space @6-36-46-135-23
noback context `["ﾁ"]%space @6-36-46-1235-23
noback context `["ﾂ"]%space @6-36-46-1345-23
noback context `["ﾃ"]%space @6-36-46-12345-23
noback context `["ﾄ"]%space @6-36-46-2345-23
noback context `["ﾀﾞ"]%space @6-36-46-5-135-23
noback context `["ﾁﾞ"]%space @6-36-46-5-1235-23
noback context `["ﾂﾞ"]%space @6-36-46-5-1345-23
noback context `["ﾃﾞ"]%space @6-36-46-5-12345-23
noback context `["ﾄﾞ"]%space @6-36-46-5-2345-23
noback context `["ﾅ"]%space @6-36-46-13-23
noback context `["ﾆ"]%space @6-36-46-123-23
noback context `["ﾇ"]%space @6-36-46-134-23
noback context `["ﾈ"]%space @6-36-46-1234-23
noback context `["ﾉ"]%space @6-36-46-234-23
noback context `["ﾊ"]%space @6-36-46-136-23
noback context `["ﾋ"]%space @6-36-46-1236-23
noback context `["ﾌ"]%space @6-36-46-1346-23
noback context `["ﾍ"]%space @6-36-46-12346-23
noback context `["ﾎ"]%space @6-36-46-2346-23
noback context `["ﾊﾞ"]%space @6-36-46-5-136-23
noback context `["ﾋﾞ"]%space @6-36-46-5-1236-23
noback context `["ﾌﾞ"]%space @6-36-46-5-1346-23
noback context `["ﾍﾞ"]%space @6-36-46-5-12346-23
noback context `["ﾎﾞ"]%space @6-36-46-5-2346-23
noback context `["ﾊﾟ"]%space @6-36-46-6-136-23
